Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-5030
Property Tax Administrator; certify distributed taxable value.

On or before August 10 of each year, the Property Tax Administrator shall certify the distributed taxable value of the property valued by the state, as equalized by the commission, to each county assessor.

Laws 1995, LB 452, § 16;

Laws 1995, LB 490, § 59;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 77-509.02;

Laws 1997, LB 397, § 48;

Laws 1998, LB 306, § 41.